Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.108.030

Advisory committee.

The office shall establish an advisory committee to assist in program design and to develop criteria for the screening and selection of scholarship recipients. The committee shall be composed of representatives of the same groups as the screening committee described in RCW 28B.108.020. The criteria shall assess the student's social and cultural ties to an American Indian community within the state. The criteria shall include a priority for upper-division or graduate students. The criteria may include a priority for students who are majoring in program areas in which expertise is needed by the state's American Indians.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 193; 1991 c 228 s 11; 1990 c 287 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.